Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.094

Antipsychotic medication, administration.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

(1) A state hospital may administer antipsychotic medication without consent to an individual who is committed under this chapter as criminally insane by following the same procedures applicable to the administration of antipsychotic medication without consent to a civilly committed patient under RCW 71.05.217, except for the following:

(a) The maximum period during which the court may authorize the administration of medication without consent under a single involuntary medication petition shall be the time remaining on the individual's current order of commitment or one hundred eighty days, whichever is shorter; and

(b) A petition for involuntary medication may be filed in either the superior court of the county that ordered the commitment or the superior court of the county in which the individual is receiving treatment, provided that a copy of any order that is entered must be provided to the superior court of the county that ordered the commitment following the hearing. The superior court of the county of commitment shall retain exclusive jurisdiction over all hearings concerning the release of the patient.

(2) The state has a compelling interest in providing antipsychotic medication to a patient who has been committed as criminally insane when refusal of antipsychotic medication would result in a likelihood of serious harm or substantial deterioration or substantially prolong the length of involuntary commitment and there is no less intrusive course of treatment than medication that is in the best interest of the patient.

[ 2012 c 256 s 12.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective date—2012 c 256: See notes following RCW 10.77.068.